Mississippi, session 2026, SB3096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of defraying the general expenses of the operation of the Mississippi National Guard for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $    12,869,082.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the Mississippi National Guard, out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Camp Shelby Timber Fund No. 3700, as created by Chapter 187, Laws of 1954, as amended; the Army National Guard Programs Fund No. 3701; the Camp Shelby Base Operations Fund No. 3705; and the Air National Guard Programs Fund No. 3709, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of applicable statutes and federal/state agreements for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........ $   247,754,521.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, the following positions are authorized: AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:          913 Time-Limited:         0 Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 2 of this act, funds in the amount of Five Million Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,300,000.00) shall be derived from the Education Enhancement Fund deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the State Educational Assistance Program. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 6.  All funds authorized to be expended herein shall be expended and otherwise accounted for in accordance with the provisions of Section 27-104-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.  If not needed for other purposes, the Adjutant General is hereby expressly authorized to invest any part of or all monies herein appropriated out of the Camp Shelby Timber Fund at the highest rate of interest obtainable and credit interest accruing on such investments to the respective fund.  Such monies may be invested in any short-term bonds, notes or other direct obligations of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi or any county or municipality of this state, which said county or municipal bonds have been approved by a reputable bonds attorney or have been validated by a decree of the court, and in any event the said bonds, notes or obligations in which such funds are invested shall mature or be redeemable prior to the time the funds so invested will be needed for the refund or refunds herein provided for. SECTION 7.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Two Million Three Hundred Thirty-nine Thousand Six Hundred Fourteen Dollars ($2,339,614.00) shall be provided for the support of the Youth Challenge Program at Camp Shelby. SECTION 8.  Of the funds provided under the provisions of this act, Six Hundred Sixty-three Thousand One Hundred Twenty-four Dollars ($663,124.00) is provided for the Armed Forces Military Museum located at Camp Shelby. SECTION 9.  Of the funds appropriated to be expended in this act, no General Funds shall be used to reimburse members and personnel of the Mississippi National Guard for the costs associated with attending authorized training.  Any expenditure of funds for the purpose of compensation of such personnel and members for per diems and travel expenses shall be expended from any federal funds which are made available to the Mississippi National Guard for ancillary purposes. SECTION 10.  Of the funds provided under the provisions of this act, an amount not to exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) is provided for the Sonny Montgomery Center for America's Veterans at Mississippi State University. SECTION 11.  Of the funds provided in Sections 1 and 2 of this act, Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) is provided for the purchase of uniforms for the Youth Challenge Program staff. SECTION 12.  The Adjutant General of Mississippi is hereby authorized to transfer any part of appropriated funds, including general funds or capital expense funds, to special funds within the Mississippi Military Department, to facilitate federal grant matching requirements.  Prior written notification of transfer shall be provided to the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration.  The Military Department shall provide an annual report of all transfers to the Chairmen of the Appropriations Committees and the Legislative Budget Office by October 1 each year, summarizing the status of projects funded by transfers to special funds over the prior fiscal years. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 14.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 15.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, Three Million Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,300,000.00) is provided for the Tricare Premium Reimbursement Program as created in SB 2018, 2026 Regular Session.  If these funds are not fully expended, they shall lapse back to the General Fund and will not be subject to transfer to other programs.  In accordance with SB 2018, a report on the effectiveness of the program, the number of participants, and the impact on medical readiness shall be provided to the Lieutenant Governors Office, the Speakers Office, the Chairmen of Appropriations in the House and Senate, and the Legislative Budget Office on December 1, 2026. SECTION 16.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Military Department for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds for renovations, repairs, general operating upgrades and additions at the Youth Challenge Academies facilities, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2034, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........ $     1,912,701.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under the provisions of this section, in no event shall the amount expended exceed the unexpended balances as of June 30, 2026.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 17.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 18.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.